Illinois, session 104th, SB67.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nurse Agency Licensing Act is amended by 5changing Sections 4, 5, and 14.1 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 510/4)  (from Ch. 111, par. 954)7    Sec. 4. Licensing. The Department shall license nurse 8agencies in accordance with this Act for the protection of the 9health, welfare and safety of patients and residents. No nurse 10agency person may lawfully establish, operate, maintain, or 11advertise as a nurse agency in the State of Illinois unless the 12nurse agency person is licensed under this Act by the 13Department of Labor. Being licensed under the Home Health, 14Home Services, and Home Nursing Agency Licensing Act does not 15relieve home health agencies that provide nurse agency 16services from the requirement of obtaining licensure under 17this Act. No health care facility shall use the services of an 18unlicensed nurse agency.19(Source: P.A. 94-379, eff. 1-1-06.) 20    (225 ILCS 510/5)  (from Ch. 111, par. 955)21    Sec. 5. Application for license. An application to operate 22a nurse agency shall be made to the Department on forms   SB0067 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06345 AAS 16381 b1provided by the Department. A separate application shall be 2submitted for each additional location from which a nurse 3agency is operated. All applications must be under oath and 4must be accompanied by an equitable application fee which will 5be set by the Department by rule. A separate license must be 6obtained for each location from which a nurse agency is 7operated unless the nurse agency is owned and managed by the 8same applicant person or persons. The Department may impose a 9fine of up to $500 for the submission of false or misleading 10information. Submission of false or misleading information is 11a petty offense punishable by a fine of $500. The application 12shall contain the following information:13        (1) name and address of the person, partnership, 14    corporation or other entity that is the applicant;15        (2) if the applicant is a corporation or limited 16    liability company, a copy of its articles of incorporation 17    or organization, a copy of its current bylaws, and the 18    names and addresses of its officers and directors and 19    shareholders owning more than 5% of the corporation's 20    stock or membership units;21        (3) the name and location of premises from which the 22    applicant will provide services;23        (4) the names and addresses of the person or persons 24    under whose management or supervision the nurse agency 25    will be operated;26        (5) a statement of financial solvency;  SB0067 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06345 AAS 16381 b1        (6) a statement detailing the experience and 2    qualifications of the applicant to operate a nurse agency, 3    however, the failure of a nurse agency to demonstrate 4    previous experience to operate an agency does not in and 5    of itself constitute grounds for the denial of a license;6        (7) evidence of compliance or intent to comply with 7    State or federal law relating to employee compensation, 8    including but not limited to, social security taxes, State 9    and federal income taxes, workers' compensation, 10    unemployment taxes, and State and federal overtime 11    compensation laws;12        (8) evidence of general and professional liability 13    insurance in the amounts of at least $1,000,000 per 14    incident and $3,000,000 in aggregate and workers' 15    compensation coverage for all nurses or certified nursing 16    aides employed, assigned, or referred by the nurse agency 17    to a health care facility;18        (8.5) copies of all currently effective contracts with 19    health care facilities; and 20        (9) any other relevant information which the 21    Department determines is necessary to properly evaluate 22    the applicant and application as required by the 23    Department by rule.24(Source: P.A. 102-946, eff. 7-1-22.) 25    (225 ILCS 510/14.1)  SB0067 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06345 AAS 16381 b1    Sec. 14.1. Investigations; orders; civil penalties. 2    (a) The Department may at any time, and shall upon 3receiving a complaint from any interested person, investigate 4any nurse agency person licensed or applying for a license 5under this Act suspected of violating any provision of any 6Section except Section 14.3. The Department shall investigate 7any nurse agency that person who operates or advertises a 8nurse agency without being licensed under this Act. The 9Department shall establish a system of reporting complaints 10against a nurse health care staffing agency. The Department 11shall publish on its website how an interested party may 12submit a complaint of a violation of this Act to the 13Department. Complaints may be made by an interested party. 14Complaints against a nurse agency shall be investigated by the 15Department of Labor. The investigations shall take into 16consideration the responsibility of health care facilities 17under Section 12 for supervising nurse agency employees 18assigned or referred to the facilities. For purposes of this 19Section, "interested party" means a health care facility, 20nurse staffing agency, or an employee of a health care 21facility or nurse staffing agency. 22    The Director or his or her authorized representative may 23examine the premises of any nurse agency, may compel by 24subpoena, for examination or inspection, the attendance and 25testimony of witnesses and the production of books, payrolls, 26records, papers and other evidence in any investigation or   SB0067 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06345 AAS 16381 b1hearing, and may administer oaths or affirmations to 2witnesses.3    (b) After appropriate notice and hearing, and if supported 4by the evidence, the Department may issue and cause to be 5served on any nurse agency person an order to cease and desist 6from violation of this Act and to take any further action that 7is reasonable to eliminate the effect of the violation of any 8Section except Section 14.3.9    Whenever it appears that any nurse agency person has 10violated a valid order of the Department issued under this 11Act, the Director may commence an action and obtain from the 12court an order directing the nurse agency person to obey the 13order of the Department or be subject to punishment for 14contempt of court.15    The Department may petition the court for an order 16enjoining any violation of any Section of this Act except 17Section 14.3.18    (c) Any nurse agency that licensee or applicant who 19violates any provision of this Act or the rules adopted under 20this Act shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to $10,000 21per occurrence payable to the Department for the purpose of 22enforcing this Act. Civil penalties may be assessed by the 23Department in an administrative action and may, if necessary, 24be recovered in a civil action brought by the Director through 25the Attorney General of the State of Illinois or the State's 26attorney of any county in which the violation occurred. The   SB0067 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06345 AAS 16381 b1court may order that the civil penalties assessed for 2violation of this Act, together with any costs or attorney's 3fees arising out of the action to collect the penalties, be 4paid to the Department. The fact that the violation has ceased 5does not excuse any nurse agency person from liability for 6civil penalties arising from the violation.7    (d) Any nurse staffing agency that has been found not to 8have paid an employee 100% of the hourly wage rate identified 9in the contract between such nurse staffing agency and health 10care facility shall be liable to the employee for the actual 11amount of the underpayment, plus damages of 5% of the amount of 12the underpayment. 13(Source: P.A. 102-946, eff. 7-1-22.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.